Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2221
Act; exemptions.

The Real Property Appraiser Act shall not apply to:

(1) Any person who is a salaried employee of (a) the federal government, (b) any agency of the state government or a political subdivision which appraises real estate, (c) any insurance company authorized to do business in this state, or (d) any bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, building and loan association, credit union, or small loan company licensed by this state or supervised or regulated by or through federal enactments covering financial institutions who renders an estimate or opinion of value of real estate or any interest in real estate when such estimate or opinion is rendered in connection with the salaried employee's employment for an entity listed in subdivisions (a) through (d) of this subdivision, except that any salaried employee of the entities listed in subdivisions (a) through (d) of this subdivision who signs a report as a credentialed real property appraiser shall be subject to the act and the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice. Any salaried employee of the entities listed in subdivisions (a) through (d) of this subdivision who is a credentialed real property appraiser and who does not sign a report as a credentialed real property appraiser shall include the following disclosure prominently with such report: This opinion of value may not meet the minimum standards contained in the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice and is not governed by the Real Property Appraiser Act;

(2) A person referred to in subsection (1) of section 81-885.16;

(3) Any person who provides assistance (a) in obtaining the data upon which assignment results are based, (b) in the physical preparation of a report, such as taking photographs, preparing charts, maps, or graphs, or typing or printing the report, or (c) that does not directly involve the exercise of judgment in arriving at the assignment results set forth in the report;

(4) Any owner of real estate, employee of the owner, or attorney licensed to practice law in this state representing the owner who renders an estimate or opinion of value of the real estate or any interest in the real estate when such estimate or opinion is for the purpose of real estate taxation, or any other person who renders such an estimate or opinion of value when that estimate or opinion requires a specialized knowledge that a real property appraiser would not have;

(5) Any owner of real estate, employee of the owner, or attorney licensed to practice law in this state representing the owner who renders an estimate or opinion of value of real estate or any interest in real estate or damages thereto when such estimate or opinion is offered as testimony in any condemnation proceeding, or any other person who renders such an estimate or opinion when that estimate or opinion requires a specialized knowledge that a real property appraiser would not have;

(6) Any owner of real estate, employee of the owner, or attorney licensed to practice law in this state representing the owner who renders an estimate or opinion of value of the real estate or any interest in the real estate when such estimate or opinion is offered in connection with a legal matter involving real property;

(7) Any person appointed by a county board of equalization to act as a referee pursuant to section 77-1502.01, except that any person who also practices as an independent real property appraiser for others shall be subject to the Real Property Appraiser Act and shall be credentialed prior to engaging in such other real property appraisal practice. Any real property appraiser appointed to act as a referee pursuant to section 77-1502.01 and who prepares a report for the county board of equalization shall not sign such report as a credentialed real property appraiser and shall include the following disclosure prominently with such report: This opinion of value may not meet the minimum standards contained in the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice and is not governed by the Real Property Appraiser Act;

(8) Any person who is appointed to serve as an appraiser pursuant to section 76-706, except that if such person is a credential holder, he or she shall (a) be subject to the scope of real property appraisal practice applicable to his or her classification of credential and (b) comply with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice, excluding standards 1 through 10; or

(9) Any person, including an independent contractor, retained by a county to assist in the appraisal of real property as performed by the county assessor of such county subject to the standards established by the Tax Commissioner pursuant to section 77-1301.01. A person so retained shall be under the direction and responsibility of the county assessor.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 21;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 22;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 17;

Laws 1999, LB 618, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 13;

Laws 2003, LB 131, § 35;

Laws 2005, LB 676, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 41;

Laws 2008, LB1011, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 41;

Laws 2016, LB729, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB731, § 7;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 27;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 70;

Laws 2021, LB23, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 53;

Laws 2024, LB992, § 7.